Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 72.72.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created, in the state treasury, an institutional impact account. The secretary of children, youth, and families ((may))shall reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of children, youth, and families. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.(2) The secretary of corrections ((may))shall reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.Sec. 2. RCW 72.72.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 715 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of children, youth, and families and the secretary of corrections shall each promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW regarding the reimbursement process for their respective agencies.(2) The office of financial management shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, establishing rates of reimbursement for law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs, under this chapter. The office of financial management shall establish a rate for each county where institutions are located.(a) The rates for law enforcement, prosecutorial, and judicial costs shall be based upon the average hourly cost, in each county, from the last closed state fiscal year period.(b) The rate for jail facilities costs shall be based upon the average daily bed rate, in each county, from the last closed state fiscal year period.(3) Reimbursement shall not be made if otherwise provided pursuant to other provisions of state law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Both the secretary of children, youth, and families and the secretary of corrections shall repromulgate rules to conform with this act.--- END ---